California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(14) The estimated cost for implementing a parental copayment system, including any costs associated with consultant contracts, state personnel, revenue collection, computer system processing, regional center operations, or any other cost factor that would need to be included in order to capture all estimated costs for implementation.

(15) The timeframe for which the parental copayment system is to be implemented.

(f) (1) In order for the department to develop a
 detailed plan for the implementation of a parental copayment system, the department shall collect information from selected families. In order to be cost efficient and prudent regarding the collection of information, the department may conduct a survey of only those families known to have children not eligible for the Medi-Cal program. The survey instrument may only be used for the sole purpose of obtaining information that is deemed necessary for the development of a parental copayment system, including the following:

(A) A family’s annual adjusted gross family income.

(B) The number of family members dependent on that income.

(C) The number of children who meet the criteria specified in subdivision (d).

(2) Results of the survey in the aggregate shall
 be provided to the Legislature as part of the department’s plan as required by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 230, Sec. 47.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4620.3.

(a) To provide more uniformity and consistency in the administrative practices and services of regional centers throughout the state, promote appropriateness of services, maximize efficiency of funding, address the state budget deficit, ensure consistency with Lanterman Act values, maintain the entitlement to services, and improve cost-effectiveness, the department, in collaboration with stakeholders, shall develop best practices for the administrative management of regional centers and for regional centers to use when purchasing services for consumers and families.

(b) In developing regional center administrative management best practices, the department shall consider the establishment of policies and procedures to ensure prudent fiscal and program management
 by regional centers; effective and efficient use of public resources; consistent practices to maximize the use of federal funds; detection and prevention of fraud, waste, and abuse; and proper contracting protocols.

(c) In developing purchase of services best practices, the department shall consider eligibility for the service; duration of service necessary to meet objectives set in an individual program plan; frequency and efficacy of the service necessary to meet objectives in an individual program plan; impact on community integration; service providers’ qualifications and performance; rates; parental and consumer responsibilities pursuant to Sections 4646.4, 4659, and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code; and self-directed service options.

(d) The department shall ensure that implementation of best practices that impact individual services and supports
 are made through the individual program planning process provided for in this division or an individualized family service plan pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code, and that consumers and families are notified of any exceptions or exemptions to the best practices and their appeal rights established in Section 4701.

(e) Purchase of services best practices developed pursuant to this section may vary by service category and may do all of the following:

(1) Establish criteria determining the type, scope, amount, duration, location, and intensity of services and supports purchased by regional centers for consumers and their families.

(2) Modify payment rates.

(3) Reflect family and consumer responsibilities, pursuant to Sections 4646.4, 4659,
 and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code.

(f) Purchase of services best practices shall include provisions for exceptions to ensure the health and safety of the consumer or to avoid out-of-home placement or institutionalization.

(g) Best practices developed pursuant to this section shall not do either of the following:

(1) Endanger a consumer’s health or safety.

(2) Compromise the state’s ability to meet its commitments to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for participation in the Home and Community-Based Services Waiver or other federal funding of services for persons with developmental disabilities.

(h) The department shall submit the proposed
 best practices to the fiscal and applicable policy committees of the Legislature by no later than May 15, 2011. This submission shall include a description of the process followed to collaborate with system stakeholders; the anticipated impact of the best practices, coupled with prior reductions on consumers, families, and providers; estimated cost savings associated with each practice; and draft statutory language necessary to implement the best practices. Implementation of the best practices shall take effect only upon subsequent legislative enactment.

(i) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 25.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 26 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 80.)
-------------------------------------------

4620.3.

(a) To provide more uniformity and consistency in the administrative practices and services of regional centers throughout the state, promote appropriateness of services, maximize efficiency of funding, address the state budget deficit, ensure consistency with Lanterman Act values, maintain the entitlement to services, and improve cost-effectiveness, the department, in collaboration with stakeholders, shall develop best practices for the administrative management of regional centers and for regional centers to use when purchasing services for consumers and families.

(b) In developing regional center administrative management best practices, the department shall consider the establishment of policies and procedures to ensure prudent fiscal
 and program management by regional centers; effective and efficient use of public resources; consistent practices to maximize the use of federal funds; detection and prevention of fraud, waste, and abuse; and proper contracting protocols.

(c) In developing purchase of services best practices, the department shall consider eligibility for the service; duration of service necessary to meet objectives set in an individual program plan; frequency and efficacy of the service necessary to meet objectives in an individual program plan; impact on community integration; service providers’ qualifications and performance; rates; parental and consumer responsibilities pursuant to Sections 4646.4, 4659, and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code; and self-directed service options.

(d) The department shall ensure that implementation of best practices that impact individual
 services and supports are made through the individual program planning process provided for in this division or an individualized family service plan pursuant to Section 95020 of the Government Code, and that consumers and families are notified of any exceptions or exemptions to the best practices and their appeal rights established in Section 4701.

(e) Purchase of services best practices developed pursuant to this section may vary by service category and may do all of the following:

(1) Establish criteria determining the type, scope, amount, duration, location, and intensity of services and supports purchased by regional centers for consumers and their families.

(2) Modify payment rates.

(3) Reflect family and consumer responsibilities, pursuant to
 Sections 4646.4, 4659, and 4677 of this code and Section 95004 of the Government Code.

(f) Purchase of services best practices shall include provisions for exceptions to ensure the health and safety of the consumer or to avoid out-of-home placement or institutionalization.

(g) Best practices developed pursuant to this section shall not do either of the following:

(1) Endanger a consumer’s health or safety.

(2) Compromise the state’s ability to meet its commitments to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for participation in the Home and Community-Based Services Waiver or other federal funding of services for persons with developmental disabilities.

(h) This section shall
 become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 26.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4620.4.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that more than a quarter of Californians are foreign born, and more than 10 percent of the state’s population speaks English “not well” or “not at all.” Access to accurate, timely, understandable, and culturally sensitive and competent information and referral services for these communities is a critical need. A review of 2018-19 purchase of service expenditures reflects the following average per capita expenditures for all age groups by ethnicity, illustrating existing disparity gaps in the developmental services system:

(A) Twenty-seven thousand nine hundred thirty-one dollars ($27,931) for individuals who are White.

(B) Twenty-two
 thousand nine hundred fourteen dollars ($22,914) for individuals who are Black or African American.

(C) Fourteen thousand eight hundred thirty-six dollars ($14,836) for individuals who are Asian.

(D) Eleven thousand seven hundred sixty dollars ($11,760) for individuals who are Latinx or Hispanic.

(2) Language access and culturally competent services are critical components to advance health and human services equity and improve outcomes for all Californians served under the Lanterman Act.

(b) The State Department of Developmental Services shall administer an enhanced language access and cultural competency initiative for individuals with developmental disabilities, their caregivers, and their family members. The department shall require regional centers
 to implement this initiative through its contracts pursuant to Section 4640.6. The primary goal is to improve quality and facilitate more consistent access to information and services.

(c) Allowable uses of the funds provided to regional centers include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of vital documents and internet website content for translation, as well as points of public contact in need of oral and sign language interpretation services.

(2) Orientations and specialized group and family information sessions with ample and publicized question and answer periods, scheduled at times considered most convenient for working families and in consultation with community leaders.

(3) Regular and periodic language needs
 assessments to determine threshold languages for document translation.

(4) Coordination and streamlining of interpretation and translation services.

(5) Implementation of quality control measures to ensure the availability, accuracy, readability, and cultural appropriateness of translations.

(d) The use of these funds shall not supplant any existing efforts or funds for similar purposes, but are intended to augment and provide maximum additional benefit to the greatest number of persons served, their caregivers, and their families.

(e) The department shall report annually, beginning January 10, 2022, as part of the Governor’s Budget and the May Revision, how these funds are being utilized and what remaining needs for language access and culturally
 competent services are identified by people served, the community, and regional centers as the initiative implements.

(f) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, regional centers shall receive specialized funding allocations to facilitate applications for payments authorized to protect the health and safety of consumers, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4681.6, for non-English-speaking individuals served. Funded activities shall include specialized outreach and case management services toward identifying
 which individuals might have an unaddressed need for a health and safety waiver and assisting with guiding individuals through the application process to meet those needs. Regional centers shall track the number of individuals served through this effort and provide this information to the department on at least an annual basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 12, Sec. 6.   (AB 143)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4620.5.

(a) Beginning as early as possible after July 1, 2021, but no later than September 1, 2021, the department shall convene a workgroup, which shall be composed of individuals described under subdivision (b), to make recommendations to the department for the development of standard performance improvement indicators and benchmarks to incentivize high-quality regional center operations.

(b) The director shall appoint members to the stakeholder group and shall consider all of the following individuals to serve as members of that group:

(1) Individuals or consultants with expertise in developing performance indicators and incentive programs within developmental disability systems or community-based
 long-term services and supports systems.

(2) Consumers and families across different geographic regions of the state, who have diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds, diverse consumer age groups, and disabilities.

(3) Regional center representatives.

(4) Service providers.

(5) Representatives of other state agencies or entities with whom the department routinely collaborates for the coordination of services for people with developmental disabilities, and who additionally have expertise in setting or reporting indicators and benchmarks, including reporting to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(6) Representatives of California’s University Centers for Excellence in
 Developmental Disabilities, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities, the protection and advocacy agency specified in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900), and consumer and family advocacy groups.

(c) By January 10, 2022, as part of the Governor’s Budget, the department shall provide a status update based on recommendations provided by the stakeholder workgroup, with an additional status update at the time of the Governor’s May Revision. These recommendations may include all of the following:

(1) Priority areas for performance indicators and benchmarks, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Equity in service access and purchase of services.

(B) Consumer employment and associated metrics.

(C) Integration of consumers in the community.

(D) Person-centered planning.

(E) Compliance with federal home and community-based standards.

(F) Consumer and family experience and satisfaction.

(G) Innovation in service availability and delivery.

(2) Surveys or other measures to assess consumer and family experience, satisfaction, and recommendations, in addition the use of data available through the National Core Indicators.

(3) Benchmarks, and a method for establishing benchmarks, to create meaningful comparisons and understanding of variation in performance
 within and between regional centers.

(4) Measures under development or already implemented by federal funding agencies for long-term services and supports, home and community-based services, incentive payments, required reporting, and the efficient and effective implementation of performance improvement systems.

(5) Additional criteria for demonstrating performance improvement, including improvement beyond benchmarks.

(6) The methodology, structure, and types of incentives to be used, including, if appropriate, a payment schedule and implementation timeline, for incentive payments to regional centers to achieve or exceed performance benchmarks. This methodology and structure shall include how the department shall take into consideration variations among regional centers, expectations for regional center community
 engagement activities, and any significant demographic, including economic or other differences, impacting a regional center’s performance and how the department might build the identified benchmarks into regional center performance contracts.

(7) A process, based on the input from regional centers and other stakeholders, the department shall use on at least an annual basis to evaluate the success of a quality improvement process, including any incentive payment program.

(d) Department-approved performance measures developed pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into regional center contracts, as set forth in Section 4629, to standardize outcome measures and benchmarks that incentivize high-quality regional center operations. The department shall give consideration to the availability of
 regional center operations funding when establishing and revising these measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 27.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4621.

The department, within the limitations of funds appropriated, shall contract with appropriate private nonprofit corporations for the establishment of regional centers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any contract entered into pursuant to this section may provide for periodic advance payments for services to be performed under such contract. No advance payment made pursuant to this section shall exceed 25 percent of the total annual contract amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4621.5.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1 of Chapter 501 of the Statutes of 1971, the department shall, within the limitations of funds appropriated, contract with an appropriate private nonprofit corporation or corporations to operate regional centers as follows:

(a) One regional center to serve the Counties of Inyo, Kern, and Mono.

(b) One regional center to serve the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4621.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow for uninterrupted supports for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities and provide for the timely allocation of resources to regional centers.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall issue and adjust funding allocations to the regional centers, as specified in Section 4620. Funding allocations and adjustments may be done, at the department’s discretion, by letter, contract, or contract amendment, and shall be consistent with, and subject to, funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act. Funding allocations and adjustments made pursuant to this section are exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the
 approval of the Department of General Services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) The exemptions provided in subdivision (b) do not apply to funding allocations and adjustments for contracts for noninformation technology goods or information technology goods and services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 28.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4622.

The state shall contract only with agencies to serve as regional centers as described in Section 4620, the governing boards of which conform to all of the following criteria by no later than January 1, 2028:

(a) (1) The governing board shall be composed of
 no more than 17
 individuals with demonstrated interest in, or knowledge of, developmental disabilities.

(2) Any existing member of the governing board as of December 31, 2027, in excess of the 17-member limit in paragraph (1) shall be permitted to complete no more than 12 months of their remaining term beyond that date if the existing member is compliant with subdivision (f).

(b) Effective January 1, 2028, membership of the governing
 board, as a whole, shall possess at least two years of experience in all of the following topics:

(1) California law.

(2) Management of a medium or large organization.

(3) Board governance, as evidenced by experience serving on the board of an entity that is not a regional center.

(4) Fiscal or financial subjects.

(5) Developmental disability programs, including program administration, service provision, or policy advocacy.

(c) The governing board shall reflect the geographic, disability, and ethnic characteristics of the area served by the regional center.

(d) A minimum of 50 percent of the members of the governing board shall be
 persons with developmental disabilities or their
 family members or legal guardians. No less than 25 percent of the members of the governing board shall be persons with developmental disabilities who are receiving regional center services.

(e) Members of the governing board shall not be permitted to serve more than seven years within each eight-year period.

(f) (1) Effective January 1, 2028, all members of the governing board, prior to assuming or continuing their role and annually thereafter to maintain their role, shall complete trainings provided by or approved by the department. The training shall be implemented following consultation with the community, including the State Council on Developmental Disabilities. Training topics shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Board management and operations, including the following:

(i) Mission.

(ii) Bylaws.

(iii) Organization structure.

(iv) Roles and responsibilities.

(v) Policies, including whistle-blower policies and protections.

(vi) Fiduciary responsibilities.

(vii) Conflicts of interest.

(viii) Robert’s Rules of Order or other comparable boardsmanship rules.

(B) Ethics.

(C) Regional center contract requirements.

(D) Obligations of the governing board as outlined in this section, including training, annual evaluation of the executive director, and review of the performance of the regional center.

(E) Legal requirements for open meetings.

(F) Catchment description and demographic information.

(G) Service access and equity issues, including, but not limited to, purchase of service information and equity measures established by the department.

(H) Overviews of the programs and services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)) and early start program under Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code.

(2) The annual continuing training required by paragraph (1) may be shorter than the initial training for new board members, as determined by the department following consultation with regional centers.

(3) The department shall issue a directive to regional centers regarding training requirements and the approved training curriculum necessary to comply with this section no later than February 1, 2027.

(4) Effective January 1, 2028, governing board members who do not meet the training requirements specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not participate in meetings and decisions of the governing board until they complete the required training.

(5) As part of its monitoring responsibility, the department shall review
 the training and support provided to board members pursuant to this subdivision to verify that it enables maximum understanding and participation by board members.

(6) Each regional center shall post on its internet website information regarding the training provided to board members

(g) (1) Whenever possible, materials and information provided to board members shall be in plain language so that a member can understand their responsibilities and exercise appropriate oversight as board members of the regional center.

(2) The regional center shall provide individualized supports and reasonable accommodations to every member of the governing board so each person can fully and effectively participate in board discussions and decisions. The regional center shall designate an employee responsible for coordinating requested supports and accommodations and
 providing accessible materials and meetings. Supports and accommodations may include, but are not limited to, pre-meeting preparation, communication supports, assistive technology, accessible formats, interpretations, facilitation, captioning, and other assistance or modifications as needed.

(3) If a board member does not feel adequately supported to effectively participate in board meetings, the board member may contact the department’s regional center liaison assigned to that regional center with those concerns.

(h) (1) The governing board
 shall appoint an advisory group composed of persons with lived experiences with intellectual and developmental disabilities representing the various categories of disability served by the regional center. The advisory group shall subsequently designate two of its members to serve on the governing board. The group shall also designate a family member or legal guardian of a person with a developmental or intellectual disability, of its members, to serve on the governing board. These designees shall have renewable terms not to exceed two years, and are subject
 to subdivisions (e) and (f).

(2) The governing board shall include at least one of the designees identified in paragraph (1) as a voting member of the governing board’s committee that recruits, screens, and recommends approval of applicants seeking to join the regional center’s governing board.

(i) The governing board shall appoint an advisory committee composed of a wide variety of persons representing the various categories of providers from which the regional center purchases client services. The advisory committee shall provide advice, guidance, recommendations, and technical assistance to the regional center board in order to assist the regional center in carrying out its mandated functions. The advisory committee shall designate one of its
 members to serve as a member of the regional center board.

(j) (1) The governing board shall annually review the performance of the executive director of the regional center. The evaluations shall be based upon the executive director’s leadership on, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) The regional center’s compliance with the objectives of its contract with the department.

(B) Compliance with required audits, and progress in addressing any findings identified in prior and most recent audits.

(C) Improving the regional center’s status on regional center performance measures.

(2) These evaluations shall provide clear future expectations to the executive director.

(3) The governing board shall
 also
 annually review the performance of the regional center in providing services that are linguistically and culturally appropriate and may provide recommendations to the executive director of the regional center based on the results of that review. The governing board’s review may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The effectiveness of the regional center’s efforts to address equity in access to and expenditures on services, inclusive of equity measures published by the department, and on efforts to improve language access to information.

(B) The regional
 center’s data regarding the number of timely translations of individual program plans, as described in paragraphs (6) and (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 4519.5.

(C) Assessment of the regional center’s website accessibility rating, relative to the federal requirements in Section 441.313 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(D) The regional center’s responsiveness to a range of community needs and concerns, including, but not limited to, intake and assessment timelines, person-centeredness, timeliness and accuracy of payments to service providers, equity including statewide equity measures, the unique needs of populations involved with the justice or child welfare systems or who have cooccurring conditions, and coordination with local entities that provide generic services.

(E) Other issues, as identified
 by the community during public meetings.

(k) No member of the board who is an employee or member of the governing board of a provider from which the regional center purchases client services shall do any of the following:

(1) Serve as an officer of the board.

(2) Vote on any fiscal matter affecting the purchase of services from any regional center provider.

(3) Vote on any issue other than as described in paragraph (2), in which the member has a financial interest, as defined in Section 87103 of the Government Code, and
 as further determined by the regional center board. The member shall provide a list of the member’s financial interests, as defined in Section 87103, to the regional center board.

(l) Nothing in this section shall prevent the appointment to a regional center governing board of a person who meets the criteria for more than one of the categories listed above.

(m) (1) Each governing
 board shall adopt an anti-retaliation policy to protect board members and regional center employees from retaliation. For purposes of this article, “retaliation” means any adverse action, threat, intimidation, coercion, or harassment because a person is acting within the scope of their responsibilities.

(2) The department shall provide all governing boards a model policy for this purpose. Any amendments to the model policy sought by an individual governing board shall not become effective before first being approved by the department.

(3) The department shall designate an employee to answer questions about this policy and receive allegations of retaliation pursuant to this policy. The department shall investigate those allegations and shall require appropriate corrective action to be taken for substantiated allegations.

(n) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific through written directives the changes made to this section by legislation enacted in the 2025-26 legislative session. These directives shall be operative until final regulations are effective, which shall be no later than September 30, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 29.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4622.5.

By August 15 of each year, the governing board of each regional center shall submit to the department detailed documentation, as determined by the department, demonstrating that the composition of the board is in compliance with Section 4622. If the composition of the governing board is not in compliance with Section 4622, the governing board shall submit a plan to the department with its board composition documentation setting forth how and, in as expeditious a manner as possible, when the board will come into compliance, in part or in whole, with Section 4622.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 13.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4623.

In the event that the governing board of the regional center is not composed of individuals as specified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 4622, such governing board shall establish a program policy committee which is composed of such individuals. The program policy committee shall appoint one of its members to serve as an ex officio member of the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4624.

When the governing board of the regional center is not composed of individuals as specified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 4622, the program policy committee to the regional center shall be responsible for establishing the program policies of the regional center. All program policies adopted by a program policy committee shall conform to the provisions of this division and the contract between the department and the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4625.

The department shall not contract with any new regional center contracting agency unless the governing board of the agency is composed of individuals as specified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 4622.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1999.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 414, Sec. 14.5.   Effective September 22, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1999, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4625.5.

(a) The governing board of each regional center shall adopt and maintain a written policy requiring the board to review and approve any regional center contract of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more, before entering into the contract.

(b) A regional center contract of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more shall not be valid unless approved by the governing board of the regional center in compliance with its written
 policy pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), for purposes of this section:

(1) (A) Until July 1, 2030, contracts requiring approval by the governing board of a regional center shall have an identified monetary value of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) or more.

(B) As of
 July 1, 2030, the monetary value for the contract specified in subparagraph (A) shall be four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000), and every five years thereafter, it shall be increased by fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(2) Contracts do not include either of the following:

(A) Vendor approval letters issued by regional centers pursuant to Section 54322 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Purchase of service authorizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 30.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4625.6.

(a) To ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations, and to assist with governance and organizational structure, the governing board of the regional center shall retain or employ an attorney by no later than July 1, 2027, to provide general legal advice and counsel. The attorney shall have at least five years of legal experience in representing a private or nonprofit public benefit corporation, government agency, or other public entity.

(b) To ensure the delivery of independent legal advice, an attorney retained or employed by the governing board of the regional center shall not be an employee of the regional center.

(c) The board’s attorney shall be present at all
 regional center board meetings and executive committee meetings where final decisions are made.

(d) The board’s attorney shall advise the governing board on matters, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The role of the board.

(2) Board operations and governance.

(3) Conduct of meetings, including parliamentary rules.

(4) Open meeting requirements.

(5) Rules for closed sessions.

(6) Executive director contract writing and compliance.

(7) Assistance for members of the board.

(8) Conflict of interest monitoring, reporting, and resolution.

(e) To permit adequate time for recruitment of an appropriately qualified attorney, as described in subdivision (a), in the event of a vacancy in this position of not more than six months, the governing board and its executive committee shall be permitted to take final action in the absence of a retained attorney. The public meeting notice shall include a statement that the board may take action at the meeting in the absence of the attorney required by this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 32.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4625.7.

The governing board of a regional center shall meet with representatives of the department upon a request by the Director of Developmental Services, and, if requested, the board shall exclude regional center employees from the meeting. The governing board shall meet with the department’s representatives without preconditions for the meeting and at a time and date determined by the department. Not infringing on the department’s authority otherwise provided in this section, at the department’s discretion, efforts shall be made to meet with a governing board of a regional center at a mutually agreed-upon time, date, and place, with the goal of promoting attendance by board members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 15.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4626.

(a) The department shall give a very high priority to ensuring that regional center board members and employees act in the course of their duties solely in the best interest of the regional center consumers and their families without regard to the interests of any other organization with which they are associated or persons to whom they are related. Board members, employees, and others acting on the regional center’s behalf, as defined in regulations issued by the department, shall be free from conflicts of interest that could adversely influence their judgment, objectivity, or loyalty to the regional center, its consumers, or its mission.

(b) In order to prevent potential conflicts of interest, a member of the governing
 board or member of the program policy committee of a regional center shall not be any of the following:

(1) An employee of the State Department of Developmental Services or any state or local agency that provides services to a regional center consumer, if employed in a capacity which includes administrative or policymaking responsibility, or responsibility for the regulation of the regional center.

(2) An employee or a member of the state council or a state council regional advisory committee.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (h) of Section 4622, an employee or member of the governing board of any entity from which the regional center purchases consumer services.

(4) Any person who has a financial interest, as defined in Section 87103 of
 the Government Code, in regional center operations, except as a consumer of regional center services.

(c) A person with a developmental disability who receives employment services through a regional center provider shall not be precluded from serving on the governing board of a regional center based solely upon receipt of these employment services.

(d) The department shall ensure that no regional center employee or board member has a conflict of interest with an entity that receives regional center funding, including, but not limited to, a nonprofit housing organization and an organization qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that actively functions in a supporting relationship to the regional center.

(e) The department shall develop and publish a standard conflict-of-interest reporting